Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2289
Victim's Compensation Fund; subrogation; subordination.

(1) Whenever a victim is paid by the Victim's Compensation Fund for loss arising out of a criminal act, the fund shall be subrogated to the rights of the victim to any restitution ordered by the court.

(2) The rights of the Victim's Compensation Fund shall be subordinate to the claims of victims who have suffered loss arising out of the offenses or any transaction which is part of the same continuous scheme of criminal activity.

Laws 1986, LB 956, § 10.

Reparations, Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, see section 81-1841.

Victim's Compensation Fund, see section 81-1835.